Hawaii statutes.
§141-10 Agricultural development and food
security special fund; establishment. [Section repealed on June
30, 2030. L 2014, c 107, §3(2).] (a) There is established within
the state treasury the agricultural development and food security special fund.

(b) The following moneys shall be
deposited into the special fund:

(1) The portion of the environmental response,
energy, and food security tax specified under section 243-3.5;

(2) Any appropriation by the legislature into the
special fund;

(3) Any grant or donation made to the special fund;
and

(4) Any interest earned on the balance of the special
fund.

(c) Subject to legislative appropriation,
moneys in the special fund may be expended for the following purposes:

(1) The awarding of grants to farmers for
agricultural production or processing activity;

(2) The acquisition of real property for agricultural
production or processing activity;

(3) The improvement of real property, dams,
reservoirs, irrigation systems, and transportation networks necessary to
promote agricultural production or processing activity, including investigative
studies to identify and assess necessary improvements to dams, reservoirs,
irrigation systems, and transportation networks;

(4) The purchase of equipment necessary for
agricultural production or processing activity;

(5) The conduct of research on and testing of
agricultural products and markets;

(6) The funding of agricultural inspector positions
within the department of agriculture;

(7) The promotion and marketing of agricultural
products grown or raised in the State;

(8) Water quality testing and improvement; and

(9) Any other activity intended to increase
agricultural production or processing that may lead to reduced importation of
food, fodder, or feed from outside the State.

(d) The department of agriculture shall
submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session on the status and progress of existing
programs and activities and the status of new programs and activities funded
under the agricultural development and food security special fund. The
report shall also include:

(1) The spending plan of the agricultural development
and food security special fund;

(2) All expenditures of agricultural development and
food security special fund moneys;

(3) The targeted markets of the expenditures,
including the reason for selecting those markets;

(4) The persons to be served using the expenditures;
and

(5) The specific objectives of the expenditures, including
measurable outcomes. [L 2010, c 73, §§7, 14; am L 2011, c 155, §1]

Note

The source note to this section is amended to read as
follows: "L 2010, c 73, §§7, 14; am L 2011, c 155, §1; am L 2014, c 107,
§3(2); am L 2015, c 185, §4".

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next